Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 4

State Industrial Access Act

54-5-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “State Industrial Access Act.”

Acts 1959, ch. 264, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-546; Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 7 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “State Industrial Access Act” for “Industrial Highway Act”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 8. March 17, 2014.

Collateral References. Highways
.5 et seq.

54-5-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Industrial highway” means any extension of, or connection with the highway system, including state and federal highways, rural roads, and municipal streets, constructed under this part;

“Industry” or “industrial” means facilities for the manufacture of goods or for the production or processing of commodities; ports or other distribution centers for the storage and shipment of goods; corporate or administrative headquarters of business firms; and any facility of a business which the department of economic and community development has determined to be eligible for a FastTrack industrial infrastructure and industrial site preparation grant or loan pursuant to §§ 4-3-715 — 4-3-717; and

“Municipality” means any county, incorporated city or town, or any public port authority or transportation authority in this state.

Acts 1959, ch. 264, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-547; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2014, ch. 546, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 7 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added the definition of “ ‘industry’ or ‘industrial’ ”; inserted the comma preceding “or connection” in the definition of “industrial highway”; and inserted “, or any public port authority or transportation authority” in the definition of “municipality”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 8. March 17, 2014.

Cited: Chapman v. Sullivan County, 608 S.W.2d 580, 1980 Tenn. LEXIS 511 (Tenn. 1980).

54-5-403. Industrial highways authorized.

To facilitate the development and expansion of industry and to provide access to industrial areas, the department is authorized to use any powers granted to it under current law and this part to develop and construct industrial highways when there is a finding made jointly by the department and the department of economic and community development that the industrial highways are an appropriate and cost-effective means to secure the development of an industrial site or park.

Municipalities are authorized to use any powers granted to them under current law and this part to participate in the construction and maintenance of the industrial highways.

Each municipality shall be responsible for the maintenance of any industrial highway within the area of its ownership or control.

Any industrial highway constructed under this part may be designated as a controlled-access highway under chapter 16 of this title.

Acts 1959, ch. 264, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-548; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2014, ch. 546, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 7 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “In order to facilitate the development and expansion of industry and to provide access to industrial areas, the department, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to use any powers granted under any general law to construct and maintain industrial highways when there is a finding by the department that the highways are clearly necessary to secure the development of an industrial site or park or lessen serious congestion and hazards or facilitate the movement of persons, commodities or raw materials, and no other feasible means exist for accomplishing these objectives.”; in (b), inserted “under current law and this part” and substituted “industrial highways” for “highways” at the end; and rewrote (c) and (d) which read: “(c) It is the intent of this part that a county or an incorporated city or town, as the case may be, shall be responsible for the local share of the highways within the area of its jurisdiction.“(d) The highways may be designated as limited access highways under chapter 16 of this title.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 8. March 17, 2014.

54-5-404. State-local agreements.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with municipalities regarding the acquisition of rights-of-way adequate for present and foreseeable needs and the proportion of preliminary engineering, design, and construction costs to be paid by the state and by the municipality.

Acts 1959, ch. 264, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A, § 54-549; Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 7 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “enter into agreements” for “make agreements” near the beginning; and substituted “preliminary engineering, design, and construction costs” for “construction and maintenance costs” near the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 8. March 17, 2014.

54-5-405. Limitation on state.

The state shall not share in the cost of constructing any part of an industrial highway within an industrial site or park or privately owned tract of land, unless the part of the industrial highway is a link in a highway serving areas beyond the industrial site or park or privately owned tract of land, in which case the rights-of-way or easements shall be conveyed to the state or municipality, as in the case of other highways.

It is the intent of this part to provide access to industrial areas where other means are inadequate and not to contribute to the internal development of any site, part or tract of land.

Acts 1959, ch. 264, § 5; T.C.A., § 54-550; Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 7 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, in (a), inserted “of the industrial highway” near the beginning; substituted the second occurrence of “industrial site or park” for “industrial park”; and inserted “or municipality” near the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 8. March 17, 2014.

54-5-406. Funds to be used.

In effectuating the purposes of this part, the department is authorized to use highway funds not specifically allotted by legislative action to other categories of highway construction and maintenance.

Notwithstanding § 54-5-405, cities and counties within this state may and are expressly authorized to use any funds available to them for the construction and maintenance of industrial highways, roads, and streets within their boundaries or within, or adjacent to, or in close proximity to any industrial sites or parks owned or partially owned by them, or lands owned or held by them for industrial use, when, in the opinion of a majority of the members of the governing body of any city or county within this state, they will facilitate industrial development and expansion.

Acts 1959, ch. 264, § 6; 1969, ch. 308, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-551; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2014, ch. 546, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 7 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment amended (a) without change.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 546, § 8. March 17, 2014.